New Jersey, session 221, A4190.
Be It Enacted by the Senate and General Assembly of the State of New Jersey: 1.    Section 23 of P.L.2013, c.27 (C.5:12-95.25) is amended to read as follows: 23.  A casino licensee shall: a.     cause the words "If you or someone you know has a gambling problem and wants help, call 1-800 GAMBLER," or some comparable language approved by the division, which language shall include the words "gambling problem" and "call 1-800 GAMBLER," to be displayed prominently at log on and log off times to any person visiting or logged onto Internet gaming; [and] b.    provide a mechanism by which a holder of a wagering account may establish the following controls on wagering activity through the wagering account: (1)   a limit on the amount of money deposited within a specified period of time and the length of time the holder will be unable to participate in gaming if the holder reaches the established deposit limit; and (2)   a temporary suspension of gaming through the account for any number of hours or days. The casino licensee shall not send gaming-related electronic mail to an account holder while gaming through his or her wagering account is suspended, if the suspension is for at least 72 hours.  The casino licensee shall provide a mechanism by which an account holder may change these controls, except that while gaming through the wagering account is suspended, the account holder may not change gaming controls until the suspension expires, but the holder shall continue to have access to the account and shall be permitted to withdraw funds from the account upon proper application therefor [.] ; and c.     integrate into its Internet gaming platform an interactive informational module that educates users on the methods and tactics used by human traffickers and how to recognize and report suspicious activities related to human trafficking, which shall be developed in consultation with organizations specializing in the detection and prevention of human trafficking. (cf: P.L.2014, c.20, s.2) 2.    This act shall take effect immediately.